Illinois, session 104th, SB1165.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Permanent Noise Monitoring Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (620 ILCS 35/1)  (from Ch. 15 1/2, par. 751)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Permanent Noise Monitoring Act.9(Source: P.A. 87-808.)